Illinois, session 104th, HB5102.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by changing Section 62 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1705/2)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 100-2)8    Sec. 2. Definitions; administrative subdivisions. 9    (a) For the purposes of this Act, unless the context 10otherwise requires:11    "Community day services" or "CDS" means a Home and 12Community-Based Waiver day program that is certified by the 13Department. Community day services provide assistance with 14gaining, maintaining, or improving skills and functioning to 15individuals with developmental disabilities. Services can 16reinforce skills or strategies taught in other settings and 17may include training and supports to help prevent or slow the 18loss of skills. Community day services take place in a 19non-residential setting, separate from the individual's 20residential setting, whether individually owned, controlled, 21or other. Community day services can be provided in a site 22certified by the Department (site-based CDS) or in community 23locations where members of the general community typically   HB5102- 2 -LRB104 18139 KTG 31578 b1congregate (non-site-based CDS). CDS activities shall promote 2greater independence and support full access to the general 3community to the same degree as persons not receiving Home and 4Community-Based Waiver services. 5    "Department" means the Department of Human Services, 6successor to the former Department of Mental Health and 7Developmental Disabilities.8    "Developmental disability" means "developmental 9disability" as defined in Section 1-106 of the Mental Health 10and Developmental Disabilities Code.11    "Intellectual disability" means the "intellectual 12disability" as defined in Section 1-116 of the Mental Health 13and Developmental Disabilities Code.14    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Human Services.15    (b) Unless the context otherwise requires:16        (1) References in this Act to the programs or 17    facilities of the Department shall be construed to refer 18    only to those programs or facilities of the Department 19    that pertain to mental health or developmental 20    disabilities.21        (2) References in this Act to the Department's service 22    providers or service recipients shall be construed to 23    refer only to providers or recipients of services that 24    pertain to the Department's mental health and 25    developmental disabilities functions.26        (3) References in this Act to employees of the   HB5102- 3 -LRB104 18139 KTG 31578 b1    Department shall be construed to refer only to employees 2    whose duties pertain to the Department's mental health and 3    developmental disabilities functions.4    (c) The Secretary shall establish such subdivisions of the 5Department as shall be desirable and shall assign to the 6various subdivisions the responsibilities and duties placed 7upon the Department by the Laws of the State of Illinois.8    (d) There is established a coordinator of services to deaf 9and hearing impaired persons with mental disabilities. In 10hiring this coordinator, every consideration shall be given to 11qualified deaf or hearing impaired individuals.12    (e) Whenever the administrative director of the 13subdivision for mental health services is not a 14board-certified psychiatrist, the Secretary shall appoint a 15Chief for Clinical Services who shall be a board-certified 16psychiatrist with both clinical and administrative experience. 17The Chief for Clinical Services shall be responsible for all 18clinical and medical decisions for mental health services.19(Source: P.A. 102-972, eff. 1-1-23.) 20    Section 10. The Community Services Act is amended by 21changing Section 2 as follows: 22    (405 ILCS 30/2)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 902)23    Sec. 2. Community services system. Services should be 24planned, developed, delivered and evaluated as part of a   HB5102- 4 -LRB104 18139 KTG 31578 b1comprehensive and coordinated system. The Department of Human 2Services shall encourage the establishment of services in each 3area of the State which cover the services categories 4described below. What specific services are provided under 5each service category shall be based on local needs; special 6attention shall be given to unserved and underserved 7populations, including children and youth, racial and ethnic 8minorities, and the elderly. The service categories shall 9include:10        (a) Prevention: services designed primarily to reduce 11    the incidence and ameliorate the severity of developmental 12    disabilities, mental illness, and substance use disorders 13    as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act;14        (b) Client Assessment and Diagnosis: services designed 15    to identify persons with developmental disabilities, 16    mental illness, and substance use disorders; to determine 17    the extent of the disability and the level of functioning; 18    to ensure that the individual's need for treatment of 19    mental disorders or substance use disorders or 20    co-occurring substance use and mental health disorders is 21    determined using a uniform screening, assessment, and 22    evaluation process inclusive of criteria; for purposes of 23    this subsection (b), a uniform screening, assessment, and 24    evaluation process refers to a process that includes an 25    appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a referral; 26    "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular instrument,   HB5102- 5 -LRB104 18139 KTG 31578 b1    tool, or process that all must utilize; information 2    obtained through client evaluation can be used in 3    individual treatment and habilitation plans; to assure 4    appropriate placement and to assist in program evaluation;5        (c) Case Coordination: services to provide information 6    and assistance to persons with disabilities to ensure that 7    they obtain needed services provided by the private and 8    public sectors; case coordination services should be 9    available to individuals whose functioning level or 10    history of institutional recidivism or long-term care 11    indicate that such assistance is required for successful 12    community living;13        (d) Crisis and Emergency: services to assist 14    individuals and their families through crisis periods, to 15    stabilize individuals under stress and to prevent 16    unnecessary institutionalization;17        (e) Treatment, Habilitation and Support: services 18    designed to help individuals develop skills which promote 19    independence and improved levels of social and vocational 20    functioning and personal growth; and to provide 21    non-treatment support services which are necessary for 22    successful community living;23        (f) Community Residential Alternatives to 24    Institutional Settings: services to provide living 25    arrangements for persons unable to live independently; the 26    level of supervision, services provided and length of stay   HB5102- 6 -LRB104 18139 KTG 31578 b1    at community residential alternatives will vary by the 2    type of program and the needs and functioning level of the 3    residents; other services may be provided in a community 4    residential alternative which promote the acquisition of 5    independent living skills and integration with the 6    community.7        (g) Community Day Services or CDS: a Home and 8    Community-Based Waiver day program that is certified by 9    the Department. Community day services provide assistance 10    with gaining, maintaining, or improving skills and 11    functioning to individuals with developmental 12    disabilities. Services can reinforce skills or strategies 13    taught in other settings and may include training and 14    supports to help prevent or slow the loss of skills. 15    Community day services take place in a non-residential 16    setting, separate from the individual's residential 17    setting, whether individually owned, controlled, or other. 18    Community day services can be provided in a site certified 19    by the Department (site-based CDS) or in community 20    locations where members of the general community typically 21    congregate (non-site-based CDS). CDS activities shall 22    promote greater independence and support full access to 23    the general community to the same degree as persons not 24    receiving Home and Community-Based Waiver services. 25(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 100-759, eff. 1-1-19.)